Georgia, session 2025_26, HB414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to government
transparency and campaign finance, is amended in Code Section 21-5-3, relating to
definitions, by revising paragraph (19) as follows:
"(19) 'Person' means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, trust, professional corporation, or
other business entity recognized in the State of Georgia, labor organization, or any other
organization or group of persons, and shall include a 'nonresident' as that term is defined
H. B. 414 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 47 3421S
in Code Section 9-10-90 who commits an act or omission or transacts business within the
state which if performed by a resident of this state would be subject to this chapter."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 21-5-6, relating to powers and duties of the
State Ethics Commission, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(c)(1) Supplemental to any investigatory or enforcement powers provided to the
commission in this chapter, if a matter or person that the commission seeks to obtain
documentation or information from is located outside the state, the commission may
request the person with such documentation or information to make such documentation
or information available to the commission or the commission representative to examine
at the location where such person, documentation, or information is located.
(2) In the event that a person refuses to comply with a request made pursuant to
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the commission may petition that such person be ordered
by the superior court to provide the documentation or information sought by the
commission. The court shall not order such compliance unless the commission has
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the court that the documentation or information under
request is pertinent or necessary to further the investigation or enforcement action
authorized by this chapter."
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 21-5-8, relating to venue, as
follows:
"21-5-8.
Venue for prosecution of civil violations of this chapter or for any other action by or on
behalf of the commission shall be in the county of the residence of the candidate or public
H. B. 414 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 47 3421S
officer at the time of the alleged violation or action, unless the person is not a Georgia
resident, in which case venue is in Fulton County."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 414 (SUB)
- 3 -